Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB717.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS 158.1415 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Age and developmentally appropriate" means topics, messages, and
teaching methods suitable for children of a particular age, age group, or
developmental level based on the cognitive, emotional, social, and
behavioral capacities of most students at that age level;
(b) "Characteristics of effective programs" means the aspects of evidence-
based programs, including development, content, and implementation of
such programs, that:
1. Have been shown to be effective in terms of increasing knowledge,
clarifying values and attitudes, increasing skills, and impacting
behavior; and
2. Are widely recognized by leading medical and public health agencies
to be effective in changing behaviors that lead to sexually transmitted
infections and diseases, unintended pregnancy, and dating violence
and sexual assault among young people;
(c) "Consent" means affirmative, conscious, and voluntary agreement to
engage in interpersonal, physical, or sexual activity;
(d) "Culturally appropriate" means materials and instruction that respond to
culturally diverse individuals, families, and communities in an inclusive,
respectful, and effective manner and includes materials and instruction that
are inclusive of race, ethnicity, languages, cultural background, religion,
gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, and different abilities;
(e) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education;
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 73
(f) "Gender expression" means the expression of one’s gender, including
expression through behavior, clothing, hair, or voice, and which may or
may not conform to socially defined behaviors and characteristics typically
associated with being either masculine or feminine;
(g) "Gender identity" means the gender-related identity, appearance,
mannerisms, or other gender-related characteristics of an individual,
regardless of the individual’s designated sex at birth and shall include a
person’s deeply held sense or knowledge of their own gender as male,
female, both, or neither;
(h) "Healthy relationship instruction" means instruction as part of a
comprehensive school health education approach which addresses the
physical, mental, emotional, and social dimensions of human relationships
and that is designed to:
1. Motivate and assist students to maintain and improve healthy
relationships, prevent disease, and reduce sexual health-related risk
behaviors; and
2. Enable and empower students to develop and demonstrate
developmentally appropriate relationships;
(i) "Human development" means the lifelong process of physical, behavioral,
cognitive, and emotional growth;
(j) "Inclusive" means curriculum that ensures that students from historically
marginalized communities see themselves reflected in classroom materials
and lessons, including but not limited to:
1. Communities of color;
2. Immigrant communities;
3. Lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender communities;
4. Communities of individuals with disabilities; and
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 73
5. Other communities whose experiences have been traditionally
left out of health education programs and policies;
(k) "Medically accurate and complete" means a program of instruction that
contains information that:
1. Has been verified or supported by the weight of research conducted in
compliance with accepted scientific methods and is published in peer-
reviewed journals;
2. Leading professional public health or medical organizations,
government agencies, and scientific advisory groups with relevant
expertise in that field recognize as accurate, objective, and complete;
and
3. Does not withhold information about external anatomy involved in
sexual functioning or the effectiveness and benefits of correct and
consistent use of condoms and other contraceptives;
(l) "Sexual orientation" means an individual’s physical, emotional, or sexual
attraction to the members of a specific gender and includes homosexuality,
heterosexuality, bisexuality, and asexuality; and
(m) "Trauma-informed" means addressing vital information about sexuality
and well-being that takes into consideration adverse life experiences and
their potential influence on sexual decision-making.
(2) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, each school district shall provide
healthy relationship instruction to all public school students in kindergarten
through grade twelve (12).
(3) The healthy relationship instruction required by subsection (2) of this section
shall include instruction on each of the following topics in at least one (1) grade
level between kindergarten and grade twelve (12) when the topic is age,
developmentally, and culturally appropriate:
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 73
(a) The changes of human development;
(b) Human anatomy, reproduction, and human development;
(c) Healthy relationships based on mutual respect, including:
1. Distinguishing between healthy and unhealthy relationships,
including friendships and relationships within families;
2. Developing effective communication, negotiation, and refusal skills,
including the skills to recognize and report inappropriate or abusive
sexual behavior;
3. Understanding bodily autonomy, setting and respecting personal
boundaries, practicing personal safety, and consent;
4. Examining the harm of gender-role stereotypes, violence, coercion,
bullying, and intimidation in relationships; and
5. Exploring the way that gender stereotypes can limit all people;
(d) Healthy decision-making skills about intimacy and relationships, including
but not limited to:
1. Critical thinking, problem solving, self-efficacy, and decision-making;
2. Exploring individual values and attitudes;
3. Promoting positive body image among students, developing an
understanding that there is a range of body types, and feeling positive
about students’ own body types;
4. How to respect others and stay safe on the internet and when using
other forms of digital communication;
5. Information on local services and resources where students can obtain
additional information related to bullying, dating violence and sexual
assault, suicide prevention, and other related care;
6. Encouraging youth to communicate with their parents or guardians;
faith, health, and social service professionals; and other trusted adults
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 73
about healthy relationships;
7. Creating a safe environment for all students and others in society; and
8. Examples of varying types of relationships, couples, and family
structures. Discussion of healthy relationships shall include
affirmative representation of lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender
individuals, relationships, and families;
(e) The benefits of abstinence;
(f) The use of condoms, medication, birth control, and sexually transmitted
infection prevention measures, and the options for pregnancy, including:
1. The importance of effectively using condoms and preventive
medication to protect against sexually transmitted infections,
including human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immune
deficiency syndrome;
2. The benefits of effective contraceptives, including condoms, in
avoiding unintended pregnancy;
3. The relationship between substance use and sexual health and
behaviors; and
4. Information about local health services where students can obtain
additional information and services related to sexual and reproductive
health and other related care;
(g) Affirmative recognition of the roles that traditions, values, religion, norms,
gender roles, acculturation, family structure, health beliefs, and political
power play in how students make decisions that affect their health. This
instruction shall include examples of varying races, ethnicities, cultures,
and families, including single-parent households and young families;
(h) Age-appropriate information about gender identity and sexual orientation
for all students, including:
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 73
1. Affirmative recognition that people have different sexual orientations,
gender identities, and gender expressions; and
2. Referrals to community resources that can provide additional support
for lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender students; and
(i) Opportunities to explore the roles that race, ethnicity, immigration status,
disability status, economic status, and language within different
communities play in how students make decisions that affect their health.
(4) The healthy relationship instruction required by subsection (2) of this section
shall implement curricula and instructional materials that:
(a) Reflect the characteristics of effective programs;
(b) Are aligned with the requirements set forth in subsection (3) of this section;
(c) Are inclusive of the experiences and needs of all youth in the school and do
not discriminate on the basis of sex, race, ethnicity, national origin,
disability, religion, gender expression, gender identity, or sexual
orientation;
(d) Are accessible to all students, including students with disabilities, through
the use of modified curriculum, materials and instruction in alternative
formats, auxiliary aids, or any other appropriate accommodation when
necessary to effectuate the purpose of delivering healthy relationship
instruction to every student; and
(e) Are trauma-informed.
(5) A school or school district shall not restrict the ability of an instructor to answer a
question initiated by a student that is related to and consistent with this section.
(6) (a) A school shall:
1. Make the curricula and instructional materials for healthy
relationship instruction offered pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section available upon the request of a parent or guardian;
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 73
2. Establish a procedure for a parent or legal guardian to submit a
signed statement to excuse a student from the instruction required by
subsection (2) of this section without disciplinary, academic, or any
other type of penalty to the student; and
3. Adopt a policy prohibiting a student from being excused from the
instruction required by subsection (2) of this section without a signed
statement submitted by a parent or guardian pursuant to a procedure
established in accordance with subparagraph 2. of this paragraph.
(b) In the event of a parent or guardian submitting a signed statement to excuse
a student from the instruction required by subsection (2) of this section, a
school is encouraged to provide that student an alternate assignment on a
related topic during the instructional time.
(7) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate any administrative
regulations necessary to implement, administer, and enforce this section,
including but not limited to administrative regulations:
(a) Establishing academic standards that are consistent with this section;
(b) Establishing minimum education and training qualifications for healthy
relationship instructors; and
(c) Requiring that each school district submit a report biennially to the
department that identifies:
1. The curricula used by the school district to provide healthy
relationship instruction;
2. The number of students that:
a. Participated in healthy relationship instruction; and
b. Were excused from healthy relationship instruction; and
3. The duration of healthy relationship instruction in each grade level.
(8) The department shall maintain a list of recommended healthy relationship
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 73
curricula, instructional materials, and other resources that are consistent with
this section.
(9) The requirements of this section shall apply to public charter schools as a health
and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(10) A parent or guardian with a child enrolled in a public school that fails to comply
with the requirements of this section may file a Circuit Court action to enforce
the provisions of this section within one (1) year from the date of the last school
day of the academic year.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Education for Healthy Youth Act.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:08 PM Jacketed